Utah statutes.
26-4-29.   Application for permit to render a dead body unavailable for
postmortem examination -- Fees -- Rulemaking authority.
(1)  Upon receiving an application by a person for a permit to render a dead
body unavailable for postmortem investigation, the medical examiner shall
review the application to determine whether:
(a)  the person is authorized by law to render the dead body unavailable for
postmortem investigation in the manner specified in the application; and
(b)  there is a need to delay any action that will render the dead body
unavailable for postmortem investigation until a postmortem investigation or
an autopsy of the dead body is performed by the medical examiner.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), within three days after receiving
an application described in Subsection (1), the medical examiner shall:
(a)  make the determinations described in Subsection (1); and
(b) (i)  issue a permit to render the dead body unavailable for postmortem
investigation in the manner specified in the application; or
(ii)  deny the permit.
(3)  The medical examiner may only deny a permit to render a dead body
unavailable for postmortem investigation if:
(a)  the applicant is not authorized by law to render the dead body
unavailable for postmortem investigation in the manner specified in the
application;
(b)  the medical examiner determines that there is a need to delay any action
that will render the dead body unavailable for postmortem investigation; or
(c)  the applicant fails to pay the fee described in Subsection (5).
(4)  If the medical examiner cannot in good faith make the determinations
described in Subsection (1) within three days after receiving an application
described in Subsection (1), the medical examiner shall notify the applicant:
(a)  that more time is needed to make the determinations described in
Subsection (1); and
(b)  of the estimated amount of time needed before the determinations
described in Subsection (1) can be made.
(5)  The medical examiner may charge a fee, pursuant to Section 63J-1-504, to
recover the costs of fulfilling the duties of the medical examiner described
in this section.
